Washington statutes.
RCW 36.34.300

Dedication of county land for streets and alleys—Execution of dedication—Effective date.

Whenever the board of county commissioners of any county deems it for the best interests of the public that any county land lying in any city or town should be dedicated to the public use for streets or alleys, it shall make and enter an order upon its records, designating the land so dedicated, and shall cause a certified copy of the order to be recorded in the auditor's office of the county in which the land is situated, and from and after entry of such order of dedication and the recording thereof as herein provided, such lands shall be thereby dedicated to the public use.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.34.300. Prior: 1903 c 89 s 2; RRS s 4027.]